Hawaii, session 2026, SB547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii faces ongoing challenges related to water scarcity due to chronic drought conditions and increasing demands on its water resources.  Promoting water conservation technologies, such as gray water recycling systems and atmospheric water generators, is essential for ensuring a sustainable and secure water future for the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to encourage the installation and use of gray water recycling systems and atmospheric water generators in the State. SECTION 2. Chapter 235, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§235-    Water conservation income tax credit.  (a) There shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, a water conservation income tax credit that shall be deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in which the credit is properly claimed. (b) In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or trust, the tax credit allowable shall be as provided under subsection (c) for the taxable year.  The cost upon which the credit is computed shall be determined at the entity level.  Distribution and share of the credit shall be determined pursuant to administrative rule.  If a deduction is taken under section 179 (with respect to election to expense depreciable business assets) of the Internal Revenue Code, no tax credit shall be allowed for that portion of the qualified expense for which the deduction is taken. (c) The amount of the tax credit shall be equal to: (1)  For each residential property in which an NSF/ANSI 350‑certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards is installed and placed in service, twenty-five per cent of the cost of the installation or $10,000, whichever is less; and (2)  For each commercial property in which an NSF/ANSI 350‑certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards is installed and placed in service, twenty per cent of the cost of the installation or $50,000, whichever is less. (d) Notwithstanding subsection (c), a low-income homeowner who installs and places in service an NSF/ANSI 350-certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards may qualify for a tax credit of thirty-five per cent of the cost of the installation or $12,500, whichever is less. (e) Beginning July 1, 2028, only atmospheric water generators that are fully NSF P343-certified shall be eligible for tax credits under this section. (f) If the tax credit under this section exceeds the taxpayer's net income tax liability, the excess of the credit over liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's income tax liability in subsequent years until exhausted; provided that no credit forward may be claimed more than five years after the initial claim for credit is made under this section. (g) The director of taxation shall: (1)  Prepare any forms necessary to claim a credit under this section; (2)  Require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable information to ascertain the validity of the claim for credit made under this section; and (3)  Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. (h) All claims for the tax credit under this section, including amended claims, shall be filed on or before the end of the twelfth month following the close of the taxable year in which the water conservation system is placed in service.  Failure to comply with this provision shall constitute a waiver of the right to claim the credit. (i) For the purposes of this section: "Atmospheric water generator" means a device that extracts water from ambient air humidity. "Area median income" means the median income for each of the counties of Honolulu, Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, from time to time, and as adjusted by family size. "Gray water" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 342D-1. "Low-income homeowner" means a person with an ownership interest in the property who resides at the property as their principal residence and whose adjusted gross income is eighty per cent or less of the area median income. "NSF/ANSI 350-certified" means certified to meet the National Sanitation Foundation/American National Standards Institute 350 certification for onsite residential and commercial water reuse treatment systems. "NSF/ANSI 350-certified gray water recycling system effluent" means effluent from an NSF/ANSI 350-certified gray water recycling system that is used only for subsurface disposal or subsurface irrigation in compliance with department of health rules and recycle or reuse water guidelines. "NSF P343" means the National Sanitation Foundation Protocol P343 - health and sanitation requirements for atmospheric water generators. "NSF P343-certified" means certified to meet NSF P343 for atmospheric water generators. "Water conservation system" means an NSF/ANSI 350-certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards." SECTION 3. (a)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall establish a rebate program to incentivize the installation of gray water recycling systems and atmospheric water generators. (b) Rebates shall be awarded as follows: (1)  For each residential property in which an NSF/ANSI 350 certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards is installed and placed in service, thirty per cent of the cost of the installation or $7,500, whichever is less; and (2)  For each commercial property in which an NSF/ANSI 350‑certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards is installed and placed in service, twenty-five per cent of the cost of the installation or $35,000, whichever is less. (c)  A low-income homeowner who installs and places in service an NSF/ANSI 350-certified gray water recycling system or an atmospheric water generator that meets NSF P343 test results and component standards may qualify for a rebate of forty per cent of the cost of the installation or $10,000, whichever is less. (d)  Beginning July 1, 2028, only atmospheric water generators that are fully NSF P343-certified shall be eligible for rebates under this section. (e)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to implement this section. (f) For the purposes of this section, the definitions established in section 235-  , Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall apply. SECTION 4. (a)  The state building code council shall adopt the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials' 2023 water efficiency and sanitation standard, incorporating provisions regulating the design, installation, and maintenance of gray water recycling systems and atmospheric water generators in the State. (b) The state building code council shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to implement this section. SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050; provided that section 2 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.